Missouri, session 2026, SB1298.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 191.226, 191.653, 191.656, 191.657,
191.658, 191.659, 191.662, 191.663, 191.671, 191.674, 191.680,
191.683, 191.689, 191.692, 191.694, 191.695, 191.699, 191.700,
191.703, 338.010, 338.730, 375.1300, 442.600, 545.940, 567.020,
567.120, and 595.226, RSMo, are repealed and thirteen new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
191.226, 191.663, 191.694, 191.695, 191.699, 191.700, 191.703,
338.010, 338.730, 375.1300, 442.600, 567.020, and 595.226, to
read as follows:
191.226. The department of health and senior services
shall pay for the cost of conducting [HIV] testing for
sexually transmitted infections or diseases for a victim of
the crime of rape as defined in section 556.030, or of the
crime of sodomy as defined in section 566.060, or of the
crime of incest as defined in section 568.020[, if a person
who is convicted of such crime is determined to be infected
with HIV based upon HIV testing conducted upon delivery of
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1298 2
the person to the department of corrections pursuant to
section 191.659. Such testing shall be limited to not more
than two enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) tests per
year and such cost of such tests shall not be paid by the
department of health and senior services for more than five
years after the date the crime was committed. HIV
testing]. Such testing shall be limited to two rounds of
testing and shall follow the best medical guidance for each
infection or disease being screened. Testing conducted
pursuant to this section shall be performed by the public
health laboratory of the department of health and senior
services.
191.663. 1. As used in this section [and section
191.659], the term ["HIV testing" means serological test or
other test upon a biological specimen to determine the
presence of the human immunodeficiency virus that causes
acquired immunodeficiency syndrome or its antibodies in the
specimen] "testing" means the current medically recommended
set of tests to screen for sexually transmitted infections
or diseases.
2. Any person who is convicted or who pleads guilty or
nolo contendere to any sexual offense defined in chapter 566
or any juvenile who is adjudicated pursuant to subsection 3
of section 211.181 for an offense which would have been a
sexual offense defined in chapter 566 if committed by an
adult, which includes, in accordance with subsection (f) of
42 U.S.C. 3756, a sexual act as defined in subparagraphs (A)
and (B) of paragraph (2) of 18 U.S.C. 2245 as an element of
the offense, shall be ordered by the court to undergo [HIV]
testing prior to incarceration without the right of refusal.
3. Costs of such [HIV] testing shall be taxed to the
defendant as costs in the criminal proceeding unless

SB 1298 3
otherwise prohibited by law. Such testing costs may be
retained by the court from the bond filed by the defendant
pursuant to subsection 4 of this section. Costs of such
[HIV] testing for juveniles [may be collected as provided
for in section 211.281] shall be paid for by the county in
which the offense occurred.
4. Any defendant charged in a court of general
jurisdiction with a sexual offense defined in chapter 566
which includes, in accordance with subsection (f) of 42
U.S.C. 3756, a sexual act as defined in subparagraphs (A)
and (B) of paragraph (2) of 18 U.S.C. 2245 as an element of
the crime, shall be required to post a minimum bond amount
for his or her release prior to trial. The minimum bond
amount shall be sufficient to cover the cost of any post-
trial [HIV] testing ordered by the court.
5. Notwithstanding any provision of [section 191.656,
or any other] law to the contrary, the victim of any crime
defined in chapter 566 which includes, in accordance with
subsection (f) of 42 U.S.C. 3756, a sexual act as defined in
subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (2) of 18 U.S.C. 2245
as an element, shall have a right to access to the results
of any [HIV] testing performed pursuant to the provisions of
this section, and the victim shall be informed of any
confirmed positive results of the [HIV] testing. If the
victim is an unemancipated minor, the minor's parents or
custodian, if any, shall also be informed. The
administrator of the jail or correctional facility in which
the defendant is confined shall also have access to the test
results.
191.694. 1. All health care professionals and health
care facilities shall adhere to universal precautions, as
defined by the Centers for Disease Control of the United

SB 1298 4
States Public Health Service, including the appropriate use
of hand washing, protective barriers, and care in the use
and disposal of needles and other sharp instruments, to
minimize the risk of transmission of [HIV, HBV and other
blood-borne infections] serious infectious or communicable
disease to patients. Health care professionals and health
care facilities shall comply with current guidelines,
established by the Centers for Disease Control, for
disinfection and sterilization of reusable devices used in
invasive procedures.
2. Health care professionals who have exudative
lesions or weeping dermatitis of the hands, forearms, or
other locations that may contact patients, particularly on
exposed areas such as hands or forearms, shall refrain from
performing all invasive procedures, and from handling
patient-care equipment and devices used in performing
invasive procedures until the condition resolves.
3. As a condition for renewal of a certificate of
registration or authority, permit, or license, all health
care facilities shall provide satisfactory evidence that
periodic training in infection control procedures, including
universal precautions, is provided to all personnel who
perform patient care services at or from such facilities.
Regulations for such training shall be promulgated by the
state regulatory authorities or bodies responsible for
licensing the respective health care facilities.
4. All health care professionals who perform invasive
procedures shall receive training on infection control
procedures relevant to [HIV and related] serious infectious
or communicable diseases, including universal precautions
and prevention of percutaneous injuries, appropriate for
their specialty and approved by the department of health and

SB 1298 5
senior services. The department of health and senior
services, in cooperation with appropriate state regulatory
authorities responsible for licensing the respective health
care professionals and in cooperation with professional
societies, shall develop regulations for such training. The
requirements set forth in this subsection shall be deemed
satisfied if the health care professional completes the
training provided in accordance with the provisions of
subsection 3 of this section.
191.695. No rule or portion of a rule promulgated
under the authority of sections 191.650 to [191.700] 191.703
shall become effective unless it has been promulgated
pursuant to the provisions of section 536.024.
191.699. Any health care professional who, after
disclosure has been made by a patient of [HIV infection] a
serious infectious or communicable disease, discriminates
against the patient on the basis of that [HIV infection]
serious infectious or communicable disease or who, prior to
such disclosure, makes [HIV] testing for serious infectious
or communicable disease a condition of treatment shall be
subject to administrative disciplinary action for violation
of a professional trust or confidence or the commission of
an act of unprofessional conduct as those terms are used in
sections 330.160, 332.321, 334.100, and 335.066.
191.700. 1. [The current assessment by the Centers
for Disease Control of the risk that infected health care
professionals will transmit HIV or HBV to patients during
invasive procedures does not justify mandatory testing to
detect infection with those viruses. Health care
professionals who perform invasive procedures are advised,
however, to know their HIV antibody status and their
hepatitis B antigen status.

SB 1298 6
2.] (1) The department of health and senior services
shall establish and oversee a voluntary evaluation process
for health care professionals infected with [HIV or HBV] a
serious infectious or communicable disease who perform
invasive procedures. This evaluation process may be
accessed directly by an infected health care professional,
or by the director of a health care facility with the
consent of the infected health care professional and after
consultation with his private physician.
(2) The confidential and individualized evaluation
shall be conducted by an expert review panel appointed by
the department of health and senior services. Each panel
shall include at least such individuals as:
(a) The health care professional's private physician;
(b) An infectious disease specialist with expertise in
the epidemiology of [HIV and HBV] serious infectious or
communicable disease transmission who is not involved in the
care of the health care professional;
(c) A health care professional with expertise in the
procedures performed by the infected health care
professional; and
(d) A state or local public health official.
(3) The department of health and senior services, in
cooperation with appropriate state regulatory authorities or
bodies responsible for licensing the respective health care
professionals and with professional societies, shall develop
uniform evaluation criteria which shall be used in
determining whether, and under what circumstances, any
restrictions or limitations should be placed on an
individual health care professional's medical practice.
These criteria shall, consistent with guidelines from the

SB 1298 7
Centers for Disease Control, include at least the following
inquiries:
(a) Whether the health care professional performs
procedures in which injury could result in that individual's
blood contamination of a patient's body cavity, subcutaneous
tissues, or mucous membranes;
(b) The nature of the invasive procedures performed by
the health care professional and the techniques used, skill
and experience, and compliance with infection control
practices demonstrated by that individual; and
(c) Whether the presence of physical or mental
impairments may interfere with the health care
professional's ability to perform such invasive procedures
safely.
(4) (a) The individualized evaluation and the
recommendations of the panel shall be based on the premise
that [HIV or HBV infection] a serious infectious or
communicable disease alone does not justify limiting the
health care professional's duties.
(b) The panel may determine which procedures the
health care professional may or may not perform, or perform
with modifications. If the panel is uncertain about whether
a procedure may pose some risk of [HIV or HBV] serious
infectious or communicable disease transmission, it may
recommend that such procedures be performed only after the
patients have been informed of the health care
professional's infection status.
(5) (a) Information obtained during the evaluation
process shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed
except to health care facilities where the health care
professional provides patient care. The department of
health and senior services may only notify or disclose to

SB 1298 8
such facilities the practice restrictions and limitations
imposed on the health care professional. Such restrictions
and limitations shall be disclosed only to those employed by
such health care facilities who have a reasonable need to
know the information.
(b) Practice restrictions or limitations recommended
by the department of health and senior services shall be
monitored by the health care facilities in which the
infected health care professional is employed. If practice
restrictions or limitations are placed on community based
health care professionals, periodic monitoring to ensure
compliance shall be performed by the department of health
and senior services.
(c) Health care professionals whose practices are
restricted or limited because of their [HIV or HBV] serious
infectious or communicable disease infection status shall,
whenever possible, be provided opportunities to continue
appropriate patient care activities.
(d) Health care facilities regulated under sections
197.010 to 197.120 may maintain or establish peer review
panels that operate under the regulations developed by the
department of health and senior services and the
recommendations of the Centers for Disease Control of the
United States Public Health Service.
(e) Any violation of practice restrictions or
limitations by a health care professional shall constitute
either an act violative of professional trust and
confidence, or failure or refusal to properly guard against
100 contagious infections or communicable diseases or the spread
101 thereof, or both, as these terms are used in sections
102 330.160, 332.321, 334.100, and 335.066. Complaints of
103 possible violations of practice restrictions or limitations

SB 1298 9
104 may be made to the appropriate state board, as provided
105 under chapter 330, chapter 332, chapter 334, or chapter 335.
106 [3.] 2. The department of health and senior services
107 shall, from time to time, review established standards for
108 preventing the transmission of [HIV or HBV] serious
109 infectious or communicable diseases from health care
110 professionals to patients and, consistent with current
111 medical knowledge and revised or updated guidelines from the
112 Centers for Disease Control, modify existing standards and
113 require additional minimum standards, as appropriate.
114 [4.] 3. Notwithstanding the provisions of sections
115 191.650 to 191.698, the department of health and senior
116 services may exercise the general authority and power under
117 section 192.020 to intervene in instances where there is
118 reason to believe that a health care professional is
119 practicing in a manner that creates a grave and
120 unjustifiable risk of injury to others.
191.703. A licensed health care facility that treats a
patient having [HIV or HBV infection] a serious infectious
or communicable disease or any other reportable infectious
or contagious disease as defined by the department of health
and senior services shall notify the funeral establishment
personnel, coroner or medical examiner involved of such
disease prior to the removal of the patient, when deceased,
from the licensed health care facility. Notification shall
be conducted in a manner that protects the confidentiality
of the deceased patient.
338.010. 1. The "practice of pharmacy" includes:
(1) The interpretation, implementation, and evaluation
of medical prescription orders, including any legend drugs
under 21 U.S.C. Section 353, and the receipt, transmission,

SB 1298 10
or handling of such orders or facilitating the dispensing of
such orders;
(2) The designing, initiating, implementing, and
monitoring of a medication therapeutic plan in accordance
with the provisions of this section;
(3) The compounding, dispensing, labeling, and
administration of drugs and devices pursuant to medical
prescription orders;
(4) The ordering and administration of vaccines
approved or authorized by the U.S. Food and Drug
Administration, excluding vaccines for cholera, monkeypox,
Japanese encephalitis, typhoid, rabies, yellow fever, tick-
borne encephalitis, anthrax, tuberculosis, dengue, Hib,
polio, rotavirus, smallpox, and any vaccine approved after
January 1, 2023, to persons at least seven years of age or
the age recommended by the Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention, whichever is older, pursuant to joint
promulgation of rules established by the board of pharmacy
and the state board of registration for the healing arts
unless rules are established under a state of emergency as
described in section 44.100;
(5) The participation in drug selection according to
state law and participation in drug utilization reviews;
(6) The proper and safe storage of drugs and devices
and the maintenance of proper records thereof;
(7) Consultation with patients and other health care
practitioners, and veterinarians and their clients about
legend drugs, about the safe and effective use of drugs and
devices;
(8) The prescribing and dispensing of any nicotine
replacement therapy product under section 338.665;

SB 1298 11
(9) The dispensing of HIV preexposure and postexposure
prophylaxis pursuant to section 338.730; and
(10) The offering or performing of those acts,
services, operations, or transactions necessary in the
conduct, operation, management and control of a pharmacy.
2. No person shall engage in the practice of pharmacy
unless he or she is licensed under the provisions of this
chapter.
3. This chapter shall not be construed to prohibit the
use of auxiliary personnel under the direct supervision of a
pharmacist from assisting the pharmacist in any of his or
her duties. This assistance in no way is intended to
relieve the pharmacist from his or her responsibilities for
compliance with this chapter and he or she will be
responsible for the actions of the auxiliary personnel
acting in his or her assistance.
4. This chapter shall not be construed to prohibit or
interfere with any legally registered practitioner of
medicine, dentistry, or podiatry, or veterinary medicine
only for use in animals, or the practice of optometry in
accordance with and as provided in sections 195.070 and
336.220 in the compounding, administering, prescribing, or
dispensing of his or her own prescriptions.
5. A pharmacist with a certificate of medication
therapeutic plan authority may provide medication therapy
services pursuant to a written protocol from a physician
licensed under chapter 334 to patients who have established
a physician-patient relationship, as described in
subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of section 191.1146, with
the protocol physician. The written protocol authorized by
this section shall come only from the physician and shall
not come from a nurse engaged in a collaborative practice

SB 1298 12
arrangement under section 334.104, or from a physician
assistant engaged in a collaborative practice arrangement
under section 334.735.
6. Nothing in this section shall be construed as to
prevent any person, firm or corporation from owning a
pharmacy regulated by sections 338.210 to 338.315, provided
that a licensed pharmacist is in charge of such pharmacy.
7. Nothing in this section shall be construed to apply
to or interfere with the sale of nonprescription drugs and
the ordinary household remedies and such drugs or medicines
as are normally sold by those engaged in the sale of general
merchandise.
8. No health carrier as defined in chapter 376 shall
require any physician with which they contract to enter into
a written protocol with a pharmacist for medication
therapeutic services.
9. This section shall not be construed to allow a
pharmacist to diagnose or independently prescribe
pharmaceuticals.
10. The state board of registration for the healing
arts, under section 334.125, and the state board of
pharmacy, under section 338.140, shall jointly promulgate
rules regulating the use of protocols for medication therapy
services. Such rules shall require protocols to include
provisions allowing for timely communication between the
pharmacist and the protocol physician or similar body
authorized by this section, and any other patient protection
provisions deemed appropriate by both boards. In order to
take effect, such rules shall be approved by a majority vote
of a quorum of each board. Neither board shall separately
promulgate rules regulating the use of protocols for
medication therapy services. Any rule or portion of a rule,

SB 1298 13
100 as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created
101 under the authority delegated in this section shall become
102 effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of
103 the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
104 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
105 if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
106 pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
107 date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
108 held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
109 authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
110 2007, shall be invalid and void.
111 11. The state board of pharmacy may grant a
112 certificate of medication therapeutic plan authority to a
113 licensed pharmacist who submits proof of successful
114 completion of a board-approved course of academic clinical
115 study beyond a bachelor of science in pharmacy, including
116 but not limited to clinical assessment skills, from a
117 nationally accredited college or university, or a
118 certification of equivalence issued by a nationally
119 recognized professional organization and approved by the
120 board of pharmacy.
121 12. Any pharmacist who has received a certificate of
122 medication therapeutic plan authority may engage in the
123 designing, initiating, implementing, and monitoring of a
124 medication therapeutic plan as defined by a written protocol
125 from a physician that may be specific to each patient for
126 care by a pharmacist.
127 13. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
128 allow a pharmacist to make a therapeutic substitution of a
129 pharmaceutical prescribed by a physician unless authorized
130 by the written protocol or the physician's prescription
131 order.

SB 1298 14
132 14. "Veterinarian", "doctor of veterinary medicine",
133 "practitioner of veterinary medicine", "DVM", "VMD", "BVSe",
134 "BVMS", "BSe (Vet Science)", "VMB", "MRCVS", or an
135 equivalent title means a person who has received a doctor's
136 degree in veterinary medicine from an accredited school of
137 veterinary medicine or holds an Educational Commission for
138 Foreign Veterinary Graduates (EDFVG) certificate issued by
139 the American Veterinary Medical Association (AVMA).
140 15. In addition to other requirements established by
141 the joint promulgation of rules by the board of pharmacy and
142 the state board of registration for the healing arts:
143 (1) A pharmacist shall administer vaccines by protocol
144 in accordance with treatment guidelines established by the
145 Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC);
146 (2) A pharmacist who is administering a vaccine shall
147 request a patient to remain in the pharmacy a safe amount of
148 time after administering the vaccine to observe any adverse
149 reactions. Such pharmacist shall have adopted emergency
150 treatment protocols.
151 16. In addition to other requirements by the board, a
152 pharmacist shall receive additional training as required by
153 the board and evidenced by receiving a certificate from the
154 board upon completion, and shall display the certification
155 in his or her pharmacy where vaccines are delivered.
156 17. A pharmacist shall inform the patient that the
157 administration of a vaccine will be entered into the
158 ShowMeVax system, as administered by the department of
159 health and senior services. The patient shall attest to the
160 inclusion of such information in the system by signing a
161 form provided by the pharmacist. If the patient indicates
162 that he or she does not want such information entered into
163 the ShowMeVax system, the pharmacist shall provide a written

SB 1298 15
164 report within fourteen days of administration of a vaccine
165 to the patient's health care provider, if provided by the
166 patient, containing:
167 (1) The identity of the patient;
168 (2) The identity of the vaccine or vaccines
169 administered;
170 (3) The route of administration;
171 (4) The anatomic site of the administration;
172 (5) The dose administered; and
173 (6) The date of administration.
174 18. A pharmacist licensed under this chapter may order
175 and administer vaccines approved or authorized by the U.S.
176 Food and Drug Administration to address a public health
177 need, as lawfully authorized by the state or federal
178 government, or a department or agency thereof, during a
179 state or federally declared public health emergency.
338.730. 1. Notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary, a pharmacist may dispense HIV preexposure and
postexposure prophylaxis in accordance with this section.
Such prophylaxis shall be dispensed only if the pharmacist
follows a written protocol authorized by a licensed
physician.
2. For purposes of this section, "preexposure and
postexposure prophylaxis" shall mean any drug approved by
the Food and Drug Administration that meets the same
clinical eligibility recommendations provided in CDC
guidelines for either preexposure prophylaxis or
postexposure prophylaxis.
3. For purposes of this section, "CDC guidelines"
shall mean the current HIV guidelines published by the
federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.

SB 1298 16
4. The state board of registration for the healing
arts and the state board of pharmacy shall jointly
promulgate rules and regulations for the administration of
this section. Neither board shall separately promulgate
rules governing a pharmacist's authority to dispense HIV
preexposure and postexposure prophylaxis under this section.
5. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2021, shall be invalid and void.
375.1300. When used in sections 375.1300 to 375.1312,
the following terms mean:
(1) "Consultant", an individual, partnership or
corporation who, for a fee, holds himself or itself out to
the public as engaged in the business of offering any
advice, counsel, opinion or service with respect to the
benefits, advantages or disadvantages promised under any
policy of insurance that could be issued in this state;
(2) "Director", the director of the department of
commerce and insurance of this state;
(3) "Genetic information", the results of a genetic
test. Genetic information shall not include family history,
the results of routine physical measurements, or the results
of chemical, blood, urine analysis, or the results of tests

SB 1298 17
for drugs or the presence of the human immunodeficiency
virus, or from results of any other tests commonly accepted
in clinical practice at the time;
(4) "Genetic test", a laboratory test of human
deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) or ribonucleic acid (RNA) used
to identify the presence or absence of inherited alterations
in the DNA or RNA which cause predisposition to disease or
illness. The term does not include routine physical
measurements and examinations, routine tests performed as a
part of a physical examination, chemical, blood or urine
analysis, cholesterol tests, tests for the presence of [the
human immunodeficiency virus] infection or disease, a test
for drugs, or tests commonly accepted in clinical practice
at the time;
(5) "Insurer", any person, reciprocal exchange,
interinsurer, Lloyds insurer, fraternal benefit society, and
any other legal entity engaged in the business of insurance,
including agents, brokers, adjusters and third-party
administrators. "Insurer" also includes health services
corporations, health maintenance organizations, prepaid
limited health care service plans, dental, optometry and
other similar health service plans. For purposes of
sections 375.930 to 375.948, such entities shall be deemed
to be engaged in the business of insurance. "Insurer" shall
also include all companies organized, incorporated or doing
business pursuant to the provisions of chapters 325, 375,
376, 377, 378, 379, 381 and 383;
(6) "Person", any natural or artificial entity,
including, but not limited to, individuals, partnerships,
associations, trusts or corporations;
(7) "Policy", "certificate" or "contract" includes any
contract of insurance, indemnity, medical, health or

SB 1298 18
hospital service, suretyship, or annuity issued, proposed
for issuance, or intended for issuance by any insurer.
442.600. 1. The fact that a parcel of real property,
or any building or structure thereon, may be a
psychologically impacted real property, or may be in close
proximity to a psychologically impacted real property shall
not be a material or substantial fact that is required to be
disclosed in a sale, exchange or other transfer of real
estate.
2. "Psychologically impacted real property" is defined
to include:
(1) Real property in which an occupant is, or was at
any time, infected [with human immunodeficiency virus] or
diagnosed with [acquired immune deficiency syndrome, or
with] any [other] disease which has been determined by
medical evidence to be highly unlikely to be transmitted
through the occupancy of a dwelling place; or
(2) Real property which was the site of a homicide or
other felony, or of a suicide.
3. No cause of action shall arise nor may any action
be brought against any real estate agent or broker for the
failure to disclose to a buyer or other transferee of real
estate that the transferred real property was a
psychologically impacted real property.
567.020. 1. A person commits the offense of
prostitution if he or she engages in or offers or agrees to
engage in sexual conduct with another person in return for
something of value to be received by any person.
2. The offense of prostitution is a class B
misdemeanor [unless the person knew prior to performing the
act of prostitution that he or she was infected with HIV in

SB 1298 19
which case prostitution is a class B felony. The use of
condoms is not a defense to this offense].
3. [As used in this section, "HIV" means the human
immunodeficiency virus that causes acquired immunodeficiency
syndrome.
4.] The judge may order a drug and alcohol abuse
treatment program for any person found guilty of
prostitution, either after trial or upon a plea of guilty,
before sentencing. [For the class B misdemeanor offense,]
Upon the successful completion of such program by the
defendant, the court may at its discretion allow the
defendant to withdraw the plea of guilty or reverse the
verdict and enter a judgment of not guilty. [For the class
B felony offense, the court shall not allow the defendant to
withdraw the plea of guilty or reverse the verdict and enter
a judgment of not guilty. The judge, however, has
discretion to take into consideration successful completion
of a drug or alcohol treatment program in determining the
defendant's sentence.
5.] 4. A person shall not be certified as an adult or
adjudicated as a delinquent for the offense of prostitution
under this section if the person was under the age of
eighteen at the time the offense occurred. In such cases
where the person was under the age of eighteen, the person
shall be classified as a victim of abuse, as defined under
section 210.110, and such abuse shall be reported
immediately to the children's division, as required under
section 210.115 and to the juvenile officer for appropriate
services, treatment, investigation, and other proceedings as
provided under chapters 207, 210, and 211. Upon request,
the local law enforcement agency and the prosecuting

SB 1298 20
attorney shall assist the children's division and the
juvenile officer in conducting the investigation.
595.226. 1. After August 28, 2007, any information
contained in any court record, whether written or published
on the internet, including any visual or aural recordings
that could be used to identify or locate any victim of an
offense under chapter 566 or a victim of domestic assault or
stalking shall be closed and redacted from such record prior
to disclosure to the public. Identifying information shall
include, but shall not be limited to, the name, home or
temporary address, personal email address, telephone number,
Social Security number, birth date, place of employment, any
health information, [including human immunodeficiency virus
(HIV) status,] any information from a forensic testing
report, or physical characteristics, including an
unobstructed visual image of the victim's face or body.
2. Any person who is requesting identifying
information of a victim and who has a legitimate interest in
obtaining such information may petition the court for an in
camera inspection of the records. If the court determines
the person is entitled to all or any part of such records,
the court may order production and disclosure of the
records, but only if the court determines that the
disclosure to the person or entity would not compromise the
welfare or safety of the victim, and only after providing
reasonable notice to the victim and after allowing the
victim the right to respond to such request.
3. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1 of
this section, the judge presiding over a case under chapter
566 or a case of domestic assault or stalking shall have the
discretion to publicly disclose identifying information
regarding the defendant which could be used to identify or

SB 1298 21
locate the victim of the crime. The victim may provide a
statement to the court regarding whether he or she desires
such information to remain closed. When making the decision
to disclose such information, the judge shall consider the
welfare and safety of the victim and any statement to the
court received from the victim regarding the disclosure.
[191.653. 1. No person shall perform or
conduct HIV testing except physicians,
hospitals, and those persons authorized by the
department of health and senior services. No
person shall be authorized by the department of
health and senior services to perform or conduct
HIV testing unless such person provides suitable
verification to the department that such testing
shall be performed in accordance with
departmental regulations governing the types of
tests performed and the manner in which they are
administered. The department may monitor the
continued compliance of such persons with
departmental regulations. Hospitals licensed
pursuant to chapter 197 shall be deemed to be in
compliance with departmental regulations
governing HIV testing.
2. All HIV testing shall be performed in
accordance with the department rules governing
HIV testing procedures.
3. Except as provided in sections 191.671
and 191.686, all physicians, hospitals, or other
persons authorized by the department of health
and senior services who perform or conduct HIV
sampling shall provide consultation with the
subject prior to taking the specimen and during
the reporting of the test results and shall
report to the department of health and senior
services the identity of any individual
confirmed to be infected with HIV.]
[191.656. 1. (1) All information known
to, and records containing any information held
or maintained by, any person, or by any agency,
department, or political subdivision of the
state concerning an individual's HIV infection

SB 1298 22
status or the results of any individual's HIV
testing shall be strictly confidential and shall
not be disclosed except to:
(a) Public employees within the agency,
department, or political subdivision who need to
know to perform their public duties;
(b) Public employees of other agencies,
departments, or political subdivisions who need
to know to perform their public duties;
(c) Peace officers, as defined in section
590.100, the attorney general or any assistant
attorneys general acting on his or her behalf,
as defined in chapter 27, and prosecuting
attorneys or circuit attorneys as defined in
chapter 56 and pursuant to section 191.657;
(d) Prosecuting attorneys or circuit
attorneys as defined in chapter 56 to prosecute
cases pursuant to section 191.677 or 567.020.
Prosecuting attorneys or circuit attorneys may
obtain from the department of health and senior
services the contact information and test
results of individuals with whom the HIV-
infected individual has had sexual intercourse
or deviate sexual intercourse. Any prosecuting
attorney or circuit attorney who receives
information from the department of health and
senior services pursuant to the provisions of
this section shall use such information only for
investigative and prosecutorial purposes and
such information shall be considered strictly
confidential and shall only be released as
authorized by this section;
(e)Persons other than public employees who
are entrusted with the regular care of those
under the care and custody of a state agency,
including but not limited to operators of day
care facilities, group homes, residential care
facilities and adoptive or foster parents;
(f) As authorized by subsection 2 of this
section;
(g) Victims of any sexual offense defined
in chapter 566, which includes sexual
intercourse or deviate sexual intercourse, as an
element of the crime or to a victim of a section

SB 1298 23
545.940 offense, in which the court, for good
cause shown, orders the defendant to be tested
for HIV, hepatitis B, hepatitis C, syphilis,
gonorrhea, or chlamydia, once the charge is
filed. Prosecuting attorneys or circuit
attorneys, or the department of health and
senior services may release information to such
victims;
(h) Any individual who has tested positive
or false positive to HIV, hepatitis B, hepatitis
C, syphilis, gonorrhea, or chlamydia, may
request copies of any and all test results
relating to said infections.
(2) Further disclosure by public employees
shall be governed by subsections 2 and 3 of this
section;
(3) Disclosure by a public employee or any
other person in violation of this section may be
subject to civil actions brought under
subsection 6 of this section, unless otherwise
required by chapter 330, 332, 334, or 335,
pursuant to discipline taken by a state
licensing board.
2. (1) Unless the person acted in bad
faith or with conscious disregard, no person
shall be liable for violating any duty or right
of confidentiality established by law for
disclosing the results of an individual's HIV
testing:
(a) To the department of health and senior
services;
(b) To health care personnel working
directly with the infected individual who have a
reasonable need to know the results for the
purpose of providing direct patient health care;
(c) Pursuant to the written authorization
of the subject of the test result or results;
(d) To the spouse of the subject of the
test result or results;
(e) To the subject of the test result or
results;
(f) To the parent or legal guardian or
custodian of the subject of the testing, if he
is an unemancipated minor;

SB 1298 24
(g) To the victim of any sexual offense
defined in chapter 566, which includes sexual
intercourse or deviate sexual intercourse, as an
element of the crime or to a victim of a section
545.940 offense, in which the court, for good
cause shown, orders the defendant to be tested
100 for HIV, hepatitis B, hepatitis C, syphilis,
101 gonorrhea, or chlamydia, once the charge is
102 filed;
103 (h) To employees of a state licensing
104 board in the execution of their duties under
105 chapter 330, 332, 334, or 335 pursuant to
106 discipline taken by a state licensing board;
107 The department of health and senior services and
108 its employees shall not be held liable for
109 disclosing an HIV-infected person's HIV status
110 to individuals with whom that person had sexual
111 intercourse or deviate sexual intercourse;
112 (2) Paragraphs (b) and (d) of subdivision
113 (1) of this subsection shall not be construed in
114 any court to impose any duty on a person to
115 disclose the results of an individual's HIV
116 testing to a spouse or health care professional
117 or other potentially exposed person, parent or
118 guardian;
119 (3) No person to whom the results of an
120 individual's HIV testing has been disclosed
121 pursuant to paragraphs (b) and (c) of
122 subdivision (1) of this subsection shall further
123 disclose such results; except that prosecuting
124 attorneys or circuit attorneys may disclose such
125 information to defense attorneys defending
126 actions pursuant to section 191.677 or 567.020
127 under the rules of discovery, or jurors or court
128 personnel hearing cases pursuant to section
129 191.677 or 567.020. Such information shall not
130 be used or disclosed for any other purpose;
131 (4) When the results of HIV testing,
132 disclosed pursuant to paragraph (b) of
133 subdivision (1) of this subsection, are included
134 in the medical record of the patient who is
135 subject to the test, the inclusion is not a
136 disclosure for purposes of such paragraph so
137 long as such medical record is afforded the same

SB 1298 25
138 confidentiality protection afforded other
139 medical records.
140 3. All communications between the subject
141 of HIV testing and a physician, hospital, or
142 other person authorized by the department of
143 health and senior services who performs or
144 conducts HIV sampling shall be privileged
145 communications.
146 4. The identity of any individual
147 participating in a research project approved by
148 an institutional review board shall not be
149 reported to the department of health and senior
150 services by the physician conducting the
151 research project.
152 5. The subject of HIV testing who is found
153 to have HIV infection and is aware of his or her
154 HIV status shall disclose such information to
155 any health care professional from whom such
156 person receives health care services. Said
157 notification shall be made prior to receiving
158 services from such health care professional if
159 the HIV-infected person is medically capable of
160 conveying that information or as soon as he or
161 she becomes capable of conveying that
162 information.
163 6. Any individual aggrieved by a violation
164 of this section or regulations promulgated by
165 the department of health and senior services may
166 bring a civil action for damages. If it is
167 found in a civil action that:
168 (1) A person has negligently violated this
169 section, the person is liable, for each
170 violation, for:
171 (a) The greater of actual damages or
172 liquidated damages of one thousand dollars; and
173 (b) Court costs and reasonable attorney's
174 fees incurred by the person bringing the action;
175 and
176 (c) Such other relief, including
177 injunctive relief, as the court may deem
178 appropriate; or
179 (2) A person has willfully or
180 intentionally or recklessly violated this

SB 1298 26
181 section, the person is liable, for each
182 violation, for:
183 (a) The greater of actual damages or
184 liquidated damages of five thousand dollars; and
185 (b) Exemplary damages; and
186 (c) Court costs and reasonable attorney's
187 fees incurred by the person bringing the action;
188 and
189 (d) Such other relief, including
190 injunctive relief, as the court may deem
191 appropriate.
192 7. No civil liability shall accrue to any
193 health care provider as a result of making a
194 good faith report to the department of health
195 and senior services about a person reasonably
196 believed to be infected with HIV, or cooperating
197 in good faith with the department in an
198 investigation determining whether a court order
199 directing an individual to undergo HIV testing
200 will be sought, or in participating in good
201 faith in any judicial proceeding resulting from
202 such a report or investigations; and any person
203 making such a report, or cooperating with such
204 an investigation or participating in such a
205 judicial proceeding, shall be immune from civil
206 liability as a result of such actions so long as
207 taken in good faith.]
[191.657. 1. No court shall issue an
order for the disclosure of confidential HIV-
related information, except a court of record of
competent jurisdiction in accordance with the
provisions of this section.
2. Pursuant to section 191.656, a court
may grant an order for disclosure of
confidential HIV-related information to peace
officers, the attorney general or any assistant
attorneys general acting on his or her behalf,
and prosecuting attorneys upon an application
showing:
(1) A compelling need for disclosure of
the information for the adjudication of a
criminal or civil proceeding;

SB 1298 27
(2) A clear and imminent danger to an
individual whose life or health may unknowingly
be at significant risk as a result of contact
with the individual to whom the information
pertains;
(3) Upon application of a state, county or
local health officer, a clear and imminent
danger to the public health; or
(4) That the applicant is lawfully
entitled to the disclosure and the disclosure is
consistent with the provisions of this section.
3. Upon receiving an application for an
order authorizing disclosure pursuant to this
section, the court shall enter an order
directing that all pleadings, papers,
affidavits, judgments, orders of the court,
briefs and memoranda of law which are part of
the application or the decision thereon, be
sealed and not made available to any person,
except to the extent necessary to conduct any
proceedings in connection with the determination
of whether to grant or deny the application,
including any appeal. Such an order shall
further direct that all subsequent proceedings
in connection with the application shall be
conducted in camera, and, where appropriate to
prevent the unauthorized disclosure of
confidential HIV-related information, that any
pleadings, papers, affidavits, judgments, orders
of the court, briefs and memoranda of law which
are part of the application or the decision
thereon not state the name of the individual
concerning whom confidential HIV-related
information is sought.
4. (1) The individual concerning whom
confidential HIV-related information is sought
and any person holding records concerning
confidential HIV-related information from whom
disclosure is sought shall be given adequate
notice of such application in a manner which
will not disclose to any other person the
identity of the individual, and shall be
afforded an opportunity to file a written
response to the application, or to appear in

SB 1298 28
person for the limited purpose of providing
evidence on the statutory criteria for the
issuance of an order pursuant to this section.
(2) The court may grant an order without
such notice and opportunity to be heard, where
an ex parte application by a state, county, or
local health officer shows that a clear and
imminent danger to an individual, whose life or
health may unknowingly be at risk, requires an
immediate order.
(3) Service of a subpoena shall not be
subject to this subdivision.
5. In assessing compelling need and clear
and imminent danger, the court shall provide
written findings of fact, including scientific
or medical findings, citing specific evidence in
the record which supports each finding, and
shall weigh the need for disclosure against the
privacy interest of the protected individual and
the public interest which may be disserved by
disclosure which deters future testing or
treatment or which may lead to discrimination.
6. An order authorizing disclosure of
confidential HIV-related information shall:
(1) Limit disclosure to that information
which is necessary to fulfill the purpose for
which the order is granted; and
(2) Limit disclosure to those persons
whose need for the information is the basis for
the order, and specifically prohibit
redisclosure by such persons to any other
persons, whether or not they are parties to the
action; and
(3) To the extent possible consistent with
this section, conform to the provisions of this
section; and
(4) Include such other measures as the
court deems necessary to limit any disclosures
not authorized by its order.]
[191.658. 1. As used in this section, the
following terms shall mean:
(1) "Disclose", to disclose, release,
transfer, disseminate or otherwise communicate

SB 1298 29
all or any part of any record orally, in writing
or by electronic means to any person or entity;
(2) "Health care practitioner", any
licensed physician, nurse practitioner or
physician's assistant;
(3) "HIV", the human immunodeficiency
virus that causes acquired immunodeficiency
syndrome;
(4) "HIV infection", the pathological
state of the human body in response to HIV;
(5) "Medically significant exposure", a
puncture through or laceration of the skin, or
contact of mucous membrane or nonintact skin
with blood, tissue, wound exudate or other body
fluids, including semen, vaginal secretions,
cerebrospinal fluid, synovial fluid, pleural
fluid, peritoneal fluid, pericardial fluid,
amniotic fluid or any body fluid containing
visible blood, or contact of intact skin with
any such body fluids when the duration of
contact is prolonged or involves an extensive
area of skin;
(6) "Person", private individuals, private
or public bodies politic, and corporations,
partnerships, trusts, and unincorporated
associations and their officers, directors,
agents or employees;
(7) "Source individual", the person who is
the source of the blood or other body fluids to
which medically significant exposure occurred.
2. A health care practitioner providing
medical treatment for a health care worker or
law enforcement officer because of a medically
significant exposure to blood or other body
fluids that occurred in the course of the
worker's or officer's employment may request
from the department of health and senior
services information regarding the HIV infection
status of the source individual. The department
of health and senior services may disclose to
the health care practitioner the HIV infection
status of the source individual if such
information is on file with the department.

SB 1298 30
3. The health care practitioner shall
disclose the HIV infection status of the source
individual to the exposed health care worker or
law enforcement officer if, in the professional
judgment of the health care practitioner, such
disclosure is necessary to assure adherence to a
prescribed treatment regimen.
4. No person to whom information about an
individual's HIV infection has been disclosed
pursuant to this section shall further disclose
such results.
5. Any person who knowingly releases
information in violation of this section is
guilty of a class A misdemeanor.]
[191.659. 1. Except as provided in
subsection 2 of this section, all individuals
who are delivered to the department of
corrections and all individuals who are released
or discharged from any correctional facility
operated by the department of corrections,
before such individuals are released or
discharged, shall undergo HIV and tuberculosis
testing without the right of refusal. In
addition, the department of corrections may
perform or conduct infectious disease testing on
offenders without the right of refusal.
2. The department of corrections shall not
perform HIV testing on an individual delivered
to the department if similar HIV testing has
been performed on the individual subsequent to
trial and if the department is able to obtain
the results of the prior HIV test.
3. The department shall inform the victim
of any sexual offense defined in chapter 566,
which includes sexual intercourse or deviate
sexual intercourse as an element of the crime,
of any confirmed positive results of HIV testing
performed on an offender within the custody of
the department. If the victim is an
unemancipated minor, the department shall also
inform the minor's parents or custodian, if any.]

SB 1298 31
[191.662. 1. The department of mental
health may perform or conduct HIV testing or HIV
sampling without the right of refusal on:
(1) Any individual participating in a
methadone treatment program for the treatment of
intravenous drug abuse and who has refused to
undergo such testing whenever there are
reasonable grounds to believe that the
individual is infected with HIV and is a
reasonable health threat to others;
(2) Any individual under the care and
custody of the department of mental health who
has refused to undergo testing whenever there
are reasonable grounds to believe that the
individual is infected with HIV and is a
reasonable health threat to others, unless such
testing is otherwise prohibited by law.
2. The department of mental health shall
not report to the department of health and
senior services the identity of any individual
for whom HIV testing pursuant to this section
confirms HIV infection if such reporting is
prohibited by federal law or regulation.]
[191.671. 1. No other section of this act
shall apply to any insurer, health services
corporation, or health maintenance organization
licensed by the department of commerce and
insurance which conducts HIV testing only for
the purposes of assessing a person's fitness for
insurance coverage offered by such insurer,
health services corporation, or health
maintenance corporation, except that nothing in
this section shall be construed to exempt any
insurer, health services corporation or health
maintenance organization in their capacity as
employers from the provisions of section 191.665
relating to employment practices.
2. Upon renewal of any individual or group
insurance policy, subscriber contractor health
maintenance organization contract covering
medical expenses, no insurer, health services
corporation or health maintenance organization
shall deny or alter coverage to any previously

SB 1298 32
covered individual who has been diagnosed as
having HIV infection or any HIV-related
condition during the previous policy or contract
period only because of such diagnosis, nor shall
any such insurer, health services corporation or
health maintenance organization exclude coverage
for treatment of such infection or condition
with respect to any such individual.
3. The director of the department of
commerce and insurance shall establish by
regulation standards for the use of HIV testing
by insurers, health services corporations and
health maintenance organizations.
4. A laboratory certified by the U.S.
Department of Health and Human Services under
the Clinical Laboratory Improvement Act of 1967,
permitting testing of specimens obtained in
interstate commerce, and which subjects itself
to ongoing proficiency testing by the College of
American Pathologists, the American Association
of Bio Analysts, or an equivalent program
approved by the Centers for Disease Control
shall be authorized to perform or conduct HIV
testing for an insurer, health services
corporation or health maintenance organization
pursuant to this section.
5. The result or results of HIV testing of
an applicant for insurance coverage shall not be
disclosed by an insurer, health services
corporation or health maintenance organization,
except as specifically authorized by such
applicant in writing. Such result or results
shall, however, be disclosed to a physician
designated by the subject of the test. If there
is no physician designated, the insurer, health
services corporation, or health maintenance
organization shall disclose the identity of
individuals residing in Missouri having a
confirmed positive HIV test result to the
department of health and senior services.
Provided, further, that no such insurer, health
services corporation or health maintenance
organization shall be liable for violating any
duty or right of confidentiality established by

SB 1298 33
law for disclosing such identity of individuals
having a confirmed positive HIV test result to
the department of health and senior services.
Such disclosure shall be in a manner that
ensures confidentiality. Disclosure of test
results in violation of this section shall
constitute a violation of sections 375.930 to
375.948 regulating trade practices in the
business of insurance. Nothing in this
subsection shall be construed to foreclose any
remedies existing on June 1, 1988.]
[191.674. 1. The department of health and
senior services may seek in its own name in a
court of competent jurisdiction a court order
directing an individual to undergo HIV testing
without the right of refusal after reasonable
efforts have been made by the department to
obtain informed consent to HIV testing. The
court shall grant such order whenever there are
reasonable grounds to believe that an individual
is infected with HIV and there is clear and
convincing evidence of a serious and present
health threat to others posed by the individual
if infected.
2. The record of any suit filed pursuant
to this section shall be closed to the public
and, at the request of the individual, any
hearing shall be held in camera.]
[191.680. 1. Any person who shall erect,
establish, continue, maintain, use, own, or
lease any building, structure, or place used for
the purpose of lewdness, assignation, or illegal
purpose involving sexual or other contact
through which transmission of HIV infection can
occur is guilty of maintaining a nuisance.
2. The building, structure, or place, or
the ground itself, in or upon which any such
lewdness, assignation, or illegal purpose is
conducted, permitted, carried on, continued, or
exists, and the furniture, fixtures, musical
instruments, and movable property used in
conducting or maintaining such nuisance, are
hereby declared to be a nuisance and shall be

SB 1298 34
enjoined and abated as provided in subsection 3
of this section.
3. If the existence of a nuisance is
admitted or established in an action pursuant to
this section or in a criminal proceeding in any
court, an order of abatement shall be entered as
part of the judgment in the case. The order
shall direct the effectual closing of the
business for any purpose, and so keeping it
closed for a period of one year.
4. The department of health and senior
services, a county prosecutor, or a circuit
attorney shall file suit in its own name in any
court of competent jurisdiction to enforce the
provisions of this section.]
[191.683. The department of health and
senior services shall regularly report to the
appropriate committees of both houses of the
general assembly:
(1) The number of individuals with HIV
infection for whom a health care plan has been
developed detailing the form and impact of such
health care plans in a manner that does not
identify or provide identifying characteristics
of an individual infected with HIV;
(2) The nature and extent to which the
department has utilized judicial proceedings in
a manner that does not identify or provide
identifying characteristics of any individual
subject to such proceedings;
(3) The form and extent of the handling of
federal funds available to the department of
health and senior services for disbursement;
(4) The form and extent of programs and
efforts funded by state funds; and
(5) Any other information such committees
shall seek.]
[191.689. 1. Only after a school has
adopted a policy consistent with recommendations
of the Centers for Disease Control on school
children who test positive for HIV shall the
department of health and senior services give
prompt and confidential notice of the identity

SB 1298 35
of any child reported to the department to have
HIV infection and the parent or guardian of any
child confirmed by the department of health and
senior services standards to have HIV infection
shall also give prompt and confidential notice
of the identity of such child to the
superintendent of the school district in which
the child resides, and if the child attends a
nonpublic elementary or secondary school, to the
chief administrative officer of such school.
2. The superintendent or chief
administrative officer may disclose the identity
of an infected child to those persons:
(1) Who are designated by the school
district to determine the fitness of an
individual to attend school; and
(2) Who have a reasonable need to know the
identity of the child in order to provide proper
health care.]
[191.692. The department of health and
senior services may promulgate rules providing
for mandatory premarital HIV testing if the
Centers for Disease Control so indicates.]
[545.940. 1. Pursuant to a motion filed
by the prosecuting attorney or circuit attorney
with notice given to the defense attorney and
for good cause shown, in any criminal case in
which a defendant has been charged by the
prosecuting attorney's office or circuit
attorney's office with any offense under chapter
566 or section 565.050, assault in the first
degree; section 565.052 or 565.060, assault in
the second degree; section 565.054 or 565.070,
assault in the third degree; section 565.056,
assault in the fourth degree; section 565.072,
domestic assault in the first degree; section
565.073, domestic assault in the second degree;
section 565.074, domestic assault in the third
degree; section 565.075, assault while on school
property; section 565.076, domestic assault in
the fourth degree; section 565.081, 565.082, or
565.083, assault of a law enforcement officer,
corrections officer, emergency personnel,

SB 1298 36
highway worker in a construction zone or work
zone, utility worker, cable worker, or probation
and parole officer in the first, second, or
third degree; section 567.020, prostitution;
section 568.045, endangering the welfare of a
child in the first degree; section 568.050,
endangering the welfare of a child in the second
degree; section 568.060, abuse of a child;
section 575.150, resisting or interfering with
an arrest; or subdivision (2) or (3) of
subsection 2 of section 191.677, knowingly or
recklessly exposing a person to a serious
infectious or communicable disease, the court
may order that the defendant be conveyed to a
state-, city-, or county-operated HIV clinic for
testing for HIV, hepatitis B, hepatitis C,
syphilis, gonorrhea, and chlamydia. The results
of such tests shall be released to the victim
and his or her parent or legal guardian if the
victim is a minor. The results of such tests
shall also be released to the prosecuting
attorney or circuit attorney and the defendant's
attorney. The state's motion to obtain said
testing, the court's order of the same, and the
test results shall be sealed in the court file.
2. As used in this section, "HIV" means
the human immunodeficiency virus that causes
acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.]
[567.120. Any person arrested for a
prostitution-related offense, who has been found
guilty of a prior prostitution-related offense,
may, within the sound discretion of the court,
be required to undergo HIV testing as a
condition precedent to the issuance of bond for
the offense.]
✓